Missouri, session 2026, HB2539.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 160, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 160.524, to read as follows:
160.524. 1. The state board of education shall develop an annual accountability
report card for each public school district, public school, and public charter school in
the state for the purpose of providing information about school performance in
accordance with the provisions of this section. In addition to providing information
about student performance, the report card shall be designed to satisfy federal reporting
requirements for the disclosure of information about students, staff, finances, and other
data. Accountability report cards shall be designed in a standardized, clear, and easily
accessible form so that they can be easily understood by parents, taxpayers, school
personnel, legislators, and the media.
2. The state board of education shall assign the duties of implementing the
provisions of this section to the department of elementary and secondary education or
may contract with a private entity in accordance with the provisions of chapter 34.
3. (1) The state board of education shall provide an embargoed version of the
school accountability report cards for the previous school year to each public school
district, public school, and public charter school by July fifteenth of each year.
(2) Within thirty-six hours of delivering the embargoed version of the report
cards to public school districts, public schools, and public charter schools, the
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2539 2
department of elementary and secondary education shall publish in a clear and easily
accessible location on its website the district and school accountability report cards for
the previous school year.
4. Before August fifteenth of each year, each public school district, public school,
and public charter school shall publish in a clear and easily accessible location on its
website the district and school accountability report cards from the previous school
year.
5. The state board of education shall assign each public school district, public
school, and public charter school one of the following ratings, which shall be based on a
zero-to-one-hundred scale:
(1) "A" for those districts and schools producing excellent student outcomes;
(2) "B" for those districts and schools producing more-than-satisfactory student
outcomes;
(3) "C" for those districts and schools producing satisfactory student outcomes;
(4) "D" for those districts and schools producing less-than-satisfactory student
outcomes; and
(5) "F" for those districts and schools failing to produce adequate student
outcomes.
6. (1) Each public school and public charter school shall earn a school rating
under subsection 5 of this section.
(2) A public school district, public school, or public charter school that does not
test at least ninety-five percent of its students shall have its rating under subsection 5 of
this section lowered by one level.
(3) (a) There is hereby created the "Show Me Success Program" to provide
financial awards to public schools that experience high student performance and those
with high student academic growth, which shall include a "Success Ready Graduate"
measure for high schools.
(b) If moneys are available, a public school or public charter school shall receive
performance-based funding of:
a. One hundred dollars per student who attends the public school or public
charter school if:
(i) The public school or public charter school is in the top five percent of all
public schools in Missouri in student performance under the criteria set forth by rule of
the state board of education; or
(ii) The public school or public charter school is in the top five percent of all
public schools in Missouri in student academic growth under the criteria set forth by
rule of the state board of education; or

HB 2539 3
b. Fifty dollars per student who attends the public school or public charter
school if:
(i) The public school or public charter school is in the top ten percent but below
the top five percent of all public schools in Missouri in student performance under the
criteria set forth by rule of the state board of education; or
(ii) The public school or public charter school is in the top ten percent but below
the top five percent of all public schools in Missouri in student academic growth under
the criteria set forth by rule of the state board of education.
(c) The rewards listed in paragraph (b) of this subdivision shall:
a. Begin after the 2026-27 state-mandated annual summative assessment; and
b. Be based upon the results of the state-mandated annual summative
assessment.
(d) Moneys shall be distributed to the school's fiscal agent and placed in the
school's account and shall be used for nonrecurring bonuses to the school faculty and
classroom staff.
7. The department shall develop a critera-referenced growth measure, called
"growth to proficiency", in addition to the existing normative value-added growth
measure. Growth to proficiency shall evaluate for each student with two consecutive
years of Missouri assessment program performance levels whether that student has
made sufficient progress to put them on a trajectory to reach grade-level proficiency
within three years or by grade ten, whichever comes first.
8. The rating under subsection 5 of this section for a public school district, public
school, or public charter school shall be based on the following factors:
(1) Student academic achievement level, calculated as the percentage of students
proficient or higher on required English language arts, math, and science assessments
through the Missouri assessment program;
(2) Student academic growth in English language arts, math, and science using a
growth to proficiency metric and a value-added growth metric of:
(a) All students; and
(b) The lowest-performing quartile of students; and
(3) For high schools:
(a) The student four-year graduation rate; and
(b) A "Success Ready Graduate" measure, calculated by the department of
elementary and secondary education, which shall include the number of students
graduating with merit or distinction and which shall include consideration of:
a. Advanced placement examinations upon which students achieve a score of
three or higher;

HB 2539 4
b. International baccalaureate examinations for an international baccalaureate
diploma programme course upon which students achieve a score of four or higher;
c. Dual enrollment in core subjects with a "C"-course grade or higher;
d. Passing an industry-recognized credential or career technical education
certificate that is high wage, high demand;
e. Completion of an early college or associate degree; and
f. Completion of stackable credentials.
9. The rating assigned under subsection 5 of this section for elementary and
100 middle schools shall be based on overall student academic achievement level, value-
101 added growth, and growth to proficiency as follows:
102 (1) Achievement level, value-added academic growth, and growth to proficiency
103 shall be calculated and reported separately for English language arts, math, and
104 science; and
105 (2) As a portion of the rating assigned:
106 (a) Academic achievement level shall represent forty percent of the rating;
107 (b) Value-added growth shall represent thirty percent of the rating; and
108 (c) Growth to proficiency shall represent thirty percent of the rating.
109 10. At least seventy-five percent of the rating assigned under subsection 5 of this
110 section for high schools shall be based on overall student academic achievement level,
111 value-added growth, and growth to proficiency as follows:
112 (1) Achievement level, value-added academic growth, and growth to proficiency
113 shall be calculated and reported separately for English language arts, math, and
114 science; and
115 (2) As a portion of the rating assigned:
116 (a) Academic achievement level shall represent twenty-five percent of the rating;
117 (b) Value-added growth shall represent twenty-five percent of the rating;
118 (c) Growth to proficiency shall represent twenty-five percent of the rating;
119 (d) The "Success Ready Graduate" measure shall represent fifteen percent of
120 the rating; and
121 (e) The student four-year graduation rate shall represent ten percent of the
122 rating.
123 11. Public school districts, public schools, and public charter schools shall report
124 for high schools the number of graduates who within six months of graduation attend
125 postsecondary education or training programs, serve in the military, serve in national or
126 community service, or are employed in a living-wage career as determined by a
127 governmental agency or nongovernmental organization with expertise in living-wage
128 calculation.

HB 2539 5
129 12. For public school districts, the annual report shall follow the same method
130 used for calculating a school grade except at the district level.
131 13. The state board of education shall additionally develop an annual
132 accountability report card for the state department of elementary and secondary
133 education for the purpose of providing information about department performance in
134 supporting districts and schools in producing positive outcomes for students. This
135 report card shall consider the following:
136 (1) The percentages of Missouri students annually attending schools rated "A",
137 "B", "C", "D", or "F" under subsection 5 of this section, with the objective being to
138 increase the percentage of students attending more highly rated schools each year;
139 (2) The performance of Missouri students on state assessments relative to
140 student performance on the National Assessment of Education Progress, with the
141 objective being to ensure that student proficiency rates on both assessments are in
142 reasonable alignment; and
143 (3) An anonymous annual survey of all leaders of Missouri local educational
144 agencies regarding their satisfaction with the efficacy and timeliness of the support and
145 communication received from the department of elementary and secondary education.
146 14. The rating scale under subsection 5 of this section shall automatically
147 increase to ensure rigor in the calculation such that when success is achieved
148 expectations are raised the following school year so that performance does not stagnate.
149 When sixty-five percent of public schools earn an "A" or a "B", the "A", "B", "C", and
150 "D" ratings of the rating scale shall each increase the following school year by five
151 percentage points to increase the level of student outcomes necessary to earn an "A",
152 "B", "C", or "D".
✔